Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB967.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 635.11. Coverage for Dyslexia.--(a) Every health insurance policy offered, issued or renewed in this Commonwealth shall provide coverage for physician services and medical, major medical or similar comprehensive-type coverage for testing for suspected dyslexia in accordance with this section and shall not exclude coverage for the screening, diagnosis or treatment of 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 medical conditions otherwise covered by the policy. The following shall apply:(1) Coverage shall include comprehensive neuropsychological examinations for the purposes of diagnosing dyslexia, pursuant to this subsection.(2) A clinician's neuropsychological report shall include comprehensive recommendations regardless of diagnosis, including a psychological, emotional and educational wellness plan for the individual evaluated.(b) Coverage under this subsection is only required if one or more of the following criteria are met:(1) The insured is at an increased hereditary risk for dyslexia owing to a family history of dyslexia.(2) The individual is a student who:(i) has failed the following number of readily available literacy screening benchmarks of proven psychometric value:(A) two, if in kindergarten or first grade; or(B) one, if in second grade or above; and(ii) is deemed at-risk according to their instructor, school or other supervising educational body.(3) The individual's pediatrician identifies the individual as at-risk for dyslexia as indicated by findings from a valid and reliable screener and recommends a neuropsychological examination; or(4) The individual is a student with a history of risk factors known to impact learning and educational outcomes, including fetal toxin exposure, prematurity or a history of neurological disorders, such as epilepsy.(c) Coverage required by subsection (a) shall be capped at six thousand dollars ($6,000) per year, indexed to inflation to 20250SB0967PN1107 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be adjusted every two years according to the United States Department of Labor Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U), for the calendar year preceding the calendar year in which the adjustment to the maximum benefit amount is promulgated by the department.(d) This section shall not apply to the following types of policies:(1) Accident only.(2) Limited benefit.(3) Credit.(4) Dental.(5) Vision.(6) Specified disease.(7) Medicare supplement.(8) Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS) supplement.(9) Long-term care or disability income.(10) Workers' compensation.(11) Automobile medical payment.(e) (1) The term "health insurance policy" when used in this section means any individual or group health insurance policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan that provides medical or health care coverage by any health care facility or licensed health care provider that is offered by or is governed under this act or any of the following:(i) Subarticle (f) of Article IV of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the "Human Services Code."(ii) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the "Health Maintenance Organization Act."(iii) The act of May 18, 1976 (P.L.123, No.54), known as the 20250SB0967PN1107 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Individual Accident and Sickness Insurance Minimum Standards Act."(iv) The former act of December 14, 1992 (P.L.835, No.134), known as the "Fraternal Benefit Societies Code."(v) A nonprofit corporation subject to 40 Pa.C.S. Chs. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) and 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).(2) The term "insurer" when used in this section means any entity that issues an individual or group health insurance policy, contract or plan described under clause (1) of this subsection.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0967PN1107 - 4 - 123456789101112